Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2820
Contracting agency; cost estimate; conduct contract negotiations.

(1) Before the construction manager begins any construction services, a contracting agency shall:

(a) Conduct an independent cost estimate for the project; and

(b) Conduct contract negotiations with the construction manager to develop a construction manager-general contractor contract for construction services.

(2) If the construction manager and the contracting agency are unable to negotiate a contract, the contracting agency may use other contract procurement processes. Persons or organizations who submitted proposals but were unable to negotiate a contract with the contracting agency shall be eligible to compete in the other contract procurement processes.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 20;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 14.